Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.360

Application of chapter to parentage action.

This chapter does not limit the time in which an action for determination of parentage may be brought under chapter 26.26A or 26.26B RCW.

[ 2019 c 46 s 5001; 1983 1st ex.s. c 41 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 41: See note following RCW 26.09.060.